District of Columbia statutes.
31-4702

Companies issuing both participating and nonparticipating policies.

Every life company doing business in the District which issues both participating and nonparticipating policies shall keep the 2 classes of business separate and shall make, and include in the annual statement to be filed with the Commissioner each year, a separate statement of the gains, losses, and expenses properly attributable to each of such classes and also showing the manner in which any general outlay of expenses of the company has been apportioned to each. No such life company shall be permitted to do business in the District unless it makes such a separation of its business. This section shall not apply to paid-up, temporary, or pure endowment insurance issued or granted in exchange for lapsed or returned policies.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1157, ch. 672, ch. V, § 2
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(j), 44 DCR 1730
This section is referenced in § 31-4701.
1981 Ed., § 35-502.
1973 Ed., § 35-702.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4701.